Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 14

Long-Term Care Community Choices Act of 2008

71-5-1401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Long-Term Care Community Choices Act of 2008.”

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1401 (Acts 1998, ch. 1093, § 1), concerning legislative findings regarding long-term care services, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1, effective July 1, 2008. See this part for new provisions regarding long-term care.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1402. Objectives of long-term care system.

The long-term care system shall recognize that aging is not a disease, but rather a natural process that often includes increasing needs for assistance with daily living activities. To the maximum extent possible and appropriate, the system shall be based on a model of care delivery that acknowledges that services delivered in home and community-based settings are not primarily medical in nature, but rather support services that will provide needed assistance with activities of daily living and that will allow persons to age in place in their homes and communities.

The long-term care system shall also recognize that persons who are elderly or who have physical disabilities, or both, are more likely to have chronic health care conditions and to need preventive, acute and chronic health care services in order to promote healthy living and improve quality of life. The system shall be designed to focus on the needs of the whole person, with coordination of care across the continuum to ensure that medical, behavioral and non-medical long-term care support needs are met.

The long-term care system shall promote independence, choice, dignity and quality of life for elderly or people with physical disabilities, or both, who need long-term care supports and services and shall include consumer-directed options that offer more choices regarding the kinds of long-term care services people need, where they are provided and who will deliver them, with appropriate mechanisms to ensure accountability for taxpayer funds.

The long-term care system shall be designed to reduce fragmentation and to offer a seamless approach to meeting people's needs, including one-stop shopping for information, counseling and assistance regarding long-term care programs in order to support informed decision making, simplified eligibility processes and one-stop shopping for all of the different kinds of services a person may need.

The long-term care system shall recognize and value the critical role of the family and other caregivers in meeting the needs of the elderly and people with physical disabilities and shall offer services such as caregiver training, adult daycare and respite that wrap around the natural support network in order to keep it in place, thereby delaying or preventing the need for more expensive institutional care.

The long-term care system shall deliver needed supports and services in the most integrated setting appropriate and cost-effective way possible in order to utilize available funding to serve as many people as possible in home and community settings.

The long-term care system shall utilize a global budget for all long-term care services for persons who are elderly or who have physical disabilities that allows funding to follow the person into the most appropriate and cost-effective long-term care setting of their choice, resulting in a more equitable balance between the proportion of medicaid long-term care expenditures for institutional, i.e., nursing facility, services and expenditures for home and community-based services and supports.

The bureau of TennCare shall report to the general assembly and shall make available to interested persons a separate accounting of long-term care expenditures for:

Nursing facility services;

Home and community-based services made under the CHOICES long-term healthcare program; and

Employment and Community First CHOICES services, under a waiver amendment to the TennCare II demonstration.

The accounting shall, under subdivision (g)(2), include prior fiscal year actual expenditures and projected current fiscal year expenditures no later than February 1 of each year. Projected upcoming fiscal year expenditures and the percentage of nursing facility services and home and community-based services relative to total expenditures for the CHOICES long-term healthcare program shall be provided by June 30 of each year.

The long-term care system shall offer a continuum of long-term care services that includes an expanded array of home and community-based options, including community-based residential alternatives to institutional care for persons who can no longer live alone, and that also includes nursing facility services as an integral part of the long-term care continuum for persons with the highest levels of need.

The long-term care system shall include a comprehensive quality approach across the entire continuum of long-term care services and settings that promotes continuous quality improvement and that focuses on customer perceptions of quality, with mechanisms to ensure ongoing feedback from persons receiving care and their families in order to immediately identify and resolve issues and to improve the overall quality of services and the system.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 3; 2012, ch. 971, § 1; 2016, ch. 1079, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1402 (Acts 1998, ch. 1093, § 4; 1999, ch. 477, §§ 4, 5), concerning the long-term care services planning council, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1, effective July 1, 2008. See this part for new provisions regarding long-term care.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

Acts 2016, ch. 1079, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “TennCare Omnibus Act of 2016”.

Law Reviews.

Late-Life Love, Part II: To Tie the Knot or Not: Planning for Long-Term Care (Monica J. Franklin), 49 Tenn. B.J. 30 (2013).

71-5-1403. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Budget allowance” means the amount of money that can be directed, utilizing the services of a fiscal intermediary, by a medicaid-eligible long-term care member participating in this consumer-directed care option, to pay for home and community-based long-term care services defined under the medicaid state plan or any federal waivers or amendments thereto that are necessary to meet the member's long-term care needs and to delay or prevent institutionalization. The budget allowance shall be based on the results of a functional assessment performed by a qualified entity and the availability of family and other caregivers who can help provide needed support, and when combined with the cost of home health services and private duty nursing in the home or other community-based setting, cannot exceed the cost of institutional care;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of finance and administration or the commissioner's designee;

“Cost-effective” means that the total cost of services provided to an eligible elderly or physically disabled adult in the home or other community-based setting does not exceed the cost of reimbursement for institutional care in a nursing facility. The total cost of services shall include the cost of home health services and private duty nursing, as well as home and community-based long-term care services provided pursuant to the medicaid state plan or any federal waiver or amendments thereto;

“Fiscal intermediary” means an entity with whom the commissioner or a contractor responsible for the coordination of medicaid primary, acute and long-term care services has contracted to help a member participating in this consumer-directed care option manage the member's budget allowance. The fiscal intermediary will manage all payments to providers and paid caregivers for specified home and community-based services on behalf of the member, process employment and tax information as applicable, review records to ensure accuracy and provide full accountability for all expenditures made on behalf of each participating member;

“Qualified entity” means an entity with which the commissioner has contracted to assess the needs of persons determined medically eligible for long-term care services and to develop care plans to address their identified needs. Such entity shall have the expertise and capacity to timely perform these services and shall not provide any direct long-term care service which may create a conflict of interest. A managed-care organization performing care coordination services under this part shall be a qualified entity only to the extent that appropriate regulatory and contractual safeguards are in place to help ensure that such assessment and care plan development processes are fair, objective and consistent with the needs of the individual and the individual's family caregivers, as applicable; and

“Rebalance” means reaching a more equitable balance between the proportion of medicaid long-term care expenditures used for institutional, i.e., nursing facility, services and those used for home and community-based services and supports under the medicaid state plan or federal waivers or amendments to the medicaid state plan or federal waivers.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1403 (Acts 1998, ch. 1093, § 5), concerning funding to enhance services related to home-based and community-based care, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1, effective July 1, 2008. See this part for new provisions regarding long-term care.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1404. Development and implementation of a statewide fully integrated risk-based long-term care system.

The commissioner shall develop and implement a statewide fully integrated risk-based long-term care system that integrates medicaid-reimbursed primary, acute and long-term care services, building in strong consumer protections and aligning incentives to ensure that the right care is delivered in the right place at the right time. The long-term care system shall rebalance the overall allocation of funding for medicaid-reimbursed long-term care services by expanding access to and utilization of cost-effective home and community-based alternatives to institutional care for medicaid-eligible individuals. The system may include, subject to the availability of funding in each year's appropriations bill, expansion of Programs of All Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) sites in additional major metropolitan areas of the state.

The commissioner shall ensure that comprehensive, person-centered care coordination across all medicaid primary, acute and long-term care services is a central component of the integrated long-term care system and the contractor risk agreement. A qualified entity shall conduct a comprehensive individualized assessment of needs in accordance with protocols developed by the commissioner, and shall develop a care plan with active participation of the member and family or other caregivers that addresses the identified needs and builds on and does not supplant family and other caregiving supports. The entity responsible for care coordination shall cost-effectively implement the care plan, assure coordination and monitoring of all medicaid primary, acute and long-term care services to assist individuals and family or other caregivers in providing and securing necessary care and assure the availability of a qualified workforce, including backup workers when necessary, to timely provide necessary services.

Nothing in this part may be construed to create an entitlement to home and community-based services; provided, however, that the commissioner shall design and implement the integrated long-term care system in a manner that affords access to the appropriate level of cost-effective home and community-based services for the greatest number of medicaid-eligible elderly or physically disabled individuals, or both, possible, subject to the availability of funding in each year's appropriation bill.

The cost of home and community-based services provided to a medicaid-eligible individual, which includes the cost of home health services or private duty nursing, or both, to the extent covered under the medicaid program, shall not exceed the cost of institutional services for that individual in a nursing facility except as permitted under the current medicaid state plan or any federal waivers.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1404 (Acts 1998, ch. 1093, § 6), concerning rules and regulations, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1, effective July 1, 2008. See this part for new provisions regarding long-term care.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1405. Single entry point into the long-term care system.

The commissioner shall ensure that there is a single entry point into the long-term care system that is responsible for ensuring that persons seeking care and their families have access to readily available, easy-to-understand information about long-term care options. Functions performed by the single entry point may include counseling and assistance in evaluating long-term care options, screening and intake for long-term care programs, facilitated enrollment for medicaid financial eligibility and assistance with evaluation of level of care in order to facilitate determination of medical eligibility for medicaid long-term care services. Activities performed by the single entry point shall be conducted based on clear and consistent policies, processes and timelines in order to expedite access to available long-term care programs and services. To ensure the most seamless and efficient system possible, medicaid-eligible persons shall not be required to go back through the single entry point in order to access long-term care services, but rather shall have a single entity that is responsible for coordinating all of the medicaid benefits the member may need, including medical, behavioral, nursing facility and home and community-based services.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1405 (Acts 1998, ch. 1093, § 7), concerning rules and regulations, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1, effective July 1, 2008. See this part for new provisions regarding long-term care.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1406. Implementation of policies and processes by commissioner.

The commissioner shall implement policies and processes that expedite the determination of medicaid categorical and financial eligibility and medical eligibility for home and community-based programs and services, either through contracted functions of the department of human services or within the bureau of TennCare. The policies and processes may include, but are not limited to, presumptive or immediate medicaid eligibility determination, fast-track eligibility determination, development of specialized units or teams for determination of medicaid eligibility for HCBS, implementation of facilitated enrollment processes and the implementation of an online medical eligibility application process.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1404 (Acts 1998, ch. 1093, § 6), concerning rules and regulations, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1, effective July 1, 2008. See this part for new provisions regarding long-term care.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1407. Level of care and continued stay criteria — Preadmission evaluation (PAE) assessment tool.

The commissioner shall develop level of care criteria for new nursing facility admissions that ensure that the most intensive level of long-term care services is provided to persons with the highest level of need. The bureau of TennCare shall define the state's medical eligibility criteria for all long-term care services, including nursing facility and home- and community-based waiver services and adopt such standards by rule pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. In circumstances under which such standards are initially adopted as emergency rules, the bureau of TennCare shall make the proposed emergency rules available through public notice or a posting on the TennCare website, and shall provide for a public hearing prior to the emergency rule's adoption and implementation. Any changes made to the emergency rules after the public hearing shall be posted on the TennCare website. The bureau of TennCare shall develop the preadmission evaluation (PAE) assessment tool, and shall make the determination of medical eligibility for long-term care services.

Nursing facility residents who meet continued stay criteria and who remain financially eligible for medicaid shall continue to be eligible to receive nursing facility services or cost-effective home and community-based waiver services, and shall not be required to meet new nursing facility level-of-care criteria.

Current enrollees in the statewide home and community-based services waiver program for persons who are elderly or adults with physical disabilities, or both, who meet continued stay criteria and remain financially eligible for medicaid shall continue to be eligible to receive cost-effective home and community-based waiver services and shall not be required to meet new nursing facility level-of-care criteria except for admission to a nursing facility.

The commissioner shall develop and seek approval of a waiver application or amendment to a waiver application that allows persons who meet a lesser level of care, i.e., who do not meet new nursing facility level-of-care criteria, but are at risk of institutional care, to qualify for a more moderate package of medicaid-reimbursed home and community-based waiver services up to a specified enrollment cap.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 8; 2012, ch. 971, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1407 was transferred to §71-5-1418 by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-1408. Strategies to encourage utilization of cost-effective home and community-based services — Requirements related to nursing facility diversion.

The commissioner shall develop and implement strategies to encourage the utilization of cost-effective home and community-based services in lieu of institutional placement.

The commissioner shall specify in contractor risk agreements with integrated long-term care contractors requirements related to nursing facility diversion. The requirements may include, but are not limited to, the following:

Documentation prior to approval of nursing facility admission that an individual and the individual's family or other caregivers have been advised of home and community-based alternatives and that the alternatives are not appropriate, cost-effective or desired; and

A requirement for care coordinators to work with hospital discharge planners and to provide face-to-face visits in nursing facilities within a minimum number of days following admission to develop a plan, as appropriate, for transition back to a home or community-based setting.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1408 was transferred to §71-5-1419 by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1409. Nursing facility transition initiative.

The commissioner shall develop and implement a nursing facility transition initiative.

The commissioner shall specify in contractor risk agreements with contractors responsible for coordination of medicaid primary, acute and long-term care services requirements related to nursing facility-to-community transitions.

Contractor requirements shall include identification of nursing facility residents who may be appropriate for transition to home and community-based settings, as well as assessment and care plan development by a qualified entity. The contractor shall plan and facilitate those transitions in a timely manner. Contractors shall be permitted to coordinate or subcontract with local community-based organizations to assist in the identification, planning and facilitation processes, and may offer, as a cost-effective alternative to continued institutional care, a per-person transition cost allowance not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for items such as, but not limited to, first month's rent, rent deposits, utility deposits, kitchen appliances, furniture and basic household items.

It is the legislative intent of this section to provide more opportunities for home and community-based services for the at-risk population, subject to the availability of funding in each year's appropriations bill.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1409 (Acts 1999, ch. 477, § 1), concerning reports of commissioner of health regarding long-term care services, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1, effective July 1, 2008. See this part for new provisions regarding long-term care. Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1410. Strategies to assist nursing facilities in diversifying their lines of business.

The commissioner shall develop and implement strategies to assist nursing facilities in diversifying their lines of business, including provision of home and community-based services and specialized nursing facility care to meet the targeted needs of chronic care populations.

The strategies may include, but are not limited to, provision of training and technical assistance, streamlined provider enrollment processes for home and community-based services and development of special acuity-based rates to meet the more intensive caregiving demands of certain chronic care populations, subject to the availability of funding in each year's appropriations bill.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1410 was transferred to §71-5-1420 by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1411. Plan to expand cost-effective community-based residential alternatives to institutional care.

The commissioner shall develop and implement a plan to expand cost-effective community-based residential alternatives to institutional care for persons who are elderly or adults with physical disabilities, or both, which may include, but not limited to, the development of multiple levels of assisted-care living facility services, adult family care homes, adult foster care homes, companion care models and other cost-effective residential alternatives to nursing facility care.

The commissioner and the board for licensing health care facilities shall work to develop or modify, or both, licensure requirements for such facilities to support a nursing facility substitute framework for members who want to age in place in residences that offer increasing levels of cost-effective home and community-based care as an alternative to institutionalization as members' needs change.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1412. Transition period following implementation of managed long-term care service delivery system.

A managed care organization (MCO) shall contract with any nursing facility licensed under title 68, chapter 11, part 2, and certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, that provides medicaid nursing facility services pursuant to an approved preadmission evaluation (PAE) and is willing to contract with the MCO to provide that service under the same terms and conditions as are offered to any other participating facility contracted with that MCO to provide that service under any policy, contract, or plan that is part of the TennCare managed long-term care service delivery system. Terms and conditions shall not include the rate of reimbursement.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as preventing the bureau of TennCare or an MCO from enforcing a contract between an MCO and a nursing facility or as preventing the bureau of TennCare from adopting reasonable and necessary requirements for the participation of a nursing facility in the TennCare program. All requirements for participation adopted after July 1, 2016, shall be promulgated by the bureau of TennCare as a rule under title 4, chapter 5, part 2, and shall include a hearing under § 4-5-203, prior to the enforcement of such requirement as part of any provider contract, unless otherwise required by federal law.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 13; 2012, ch. 971, § 3; 2014, ch. 859, § 2; 2016, ch. 883, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1413. Acuity-based reimbursement methodology for nursing facility services.

The commissioner shall develop and implement an acuity-based reimbursement methodology for nursing facility services, based on an individualized assessment of need, as an alternative to the current cost-based nursing facility reimbursement system.

The methodology may include, but is not limited to, the development of enhanced rates for specified chronic care services that may encourage the establishment of chronic care units that specialize in the care of persons with specified chronic care conditions, such as persons who are ventilator-dependent.

The comptroller of the treasury shall set the medicaid rates for nursing facility services under the existing cost-based nursing facility reimbursement system and any acuity-based reimbursement system developed pursuant to this section and adopted by the bureau of TennCare in a rulemaking hearing in which interested persons may provide testimony under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. To the extent possible, any acuity-based reimbursement system shall be implemented in conjunction with the implementation of § 71-5-1407. Nothing in this section shall prevent TennCare from implementing rate adjustments as required pursuant to an act (including an annual appropriation act) of the general assembly that requires such adjustment. Nor shall TennCare be required to promulgate a rule to implement rate adjustments that are required pursuant to an act of the general assembly, unless such implementation requires a change in the underlying rate methodology.

When both acuity and quality supplemental transition payments as described in § 71-5-1004 are transitioned into the medicaid per diem rates of the nursing home reimbursement system, the bureau of TennCare is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement a new nursing home reimbursement system, subject to the following limitations:

Any rules promulgated by the bureau of TennCare under this subsection (d) shall be developed in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury and with the Tennessee Health Care Association; and

Any rules or regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act; provided, however, that the bureau of TennCare shall not promulgate emergency rules under this subsection (d) as authorized in § 4-5-208.

Under any TennCare dual-eligible demonstration project, skilled nursing facilities shall be reimbursed for medicare skilled nursing facility services in an amount that is consistent with the net payment they would have received for the service absent such demonstration in a medicare fee-for-service system, taking together the primary payment by medicare and the secondary payment of cost sharing by medicaid, in accordance with the institutional crossover payment methodology set forth in the medicaid state plan. Nursing facilities participating in any TennCare dual-eligible demonstration project shall be reimbursed for medicaid nursing facility services in a manner that is consistent with the methodology for medicaid nursing facility services delivered outside the demonstration. Nothing in this section shall prevent a skilled nursing facility or nursing facility from agreeing, at its own discretion, to contract with an MCO under any alternative payment methodology including, but not limited to, shared risk or savings arrangements or quality incentive payments that may be offered under such dual demonstration in order to promote evidence-based best practices and to engage the facility in key quality improvements, such as reduced avoidable hospital admissions and reduced hospital readmissions.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 14; 2012, ch. 971, § 4; 2016, ch. 883, § 16; 2017, ch. 377, § 6; 2018, ch. 836, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.